test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-Ж_8Е-вещь_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - вещь M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      вещь+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: ве́щь
      вещь+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: ве́щь
      вещь+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: ве́щи
      вещь+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: ве́щи
      вещь+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: ве́щи
      вещь+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: ве́щью
      вещь+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: ве́щи
      вещь+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Inan: ве́щи
      вещь+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: веще́й
      вещь+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: веща́х
      вещь+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: веща́м
      вещь+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: веща́ми
      
